Massachusetts, session 194th, S658.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Chapter 21A of the General Laws, as printed in the 2022 Edition, is hereby amended by 
inserting after Section 28 the following:- 
Section 29. There is hereby created and placed within the office of environmental affairs 
a body politic and corporate and a public instrumentality to be known as the Massachusetts 
Flood Management and Mitigation Authority, referred to in this section as the Authority, which 
shall serve to coordinate flood management and mitigation efforts by local governments, tribal 
authorities, regional planning bodies, watershed organizations and environmental nonprofits, 
philanthropic organizations, and other entities. 
(a) The Authority shall be an independent public authority not subject to the 
supervision or control of the executive office of environmental affairs or of any other executive 
office, department, commission, board, bureau, agency or political subdivision of the 
commonwealth except to the extent and in the manner provided in this act.  

of 2 13  (b) The Authority shall develop rules and regulations to protect the commonwealth’s 
natural resources, infrastructure, and the property of its residents. 
(c) The Authority shall, with respect to itself and the entities it regulates prioritize the 
conservation of the natural resources of the commonwealth and center equity and environmental 
justice in all planning, design, construction, operation, maintenance and financial activities. 
(d) The Authority shall be empowered to plan, design, build, operate, and fund flood 
control systems 
(e) The Authority shall be empowered to borrow money and issue bonds and to 
pledge or assign or create security interests in funds or revenues of the Authority to pay or secure 
such bonds 
(f) The Authority shall submit a report annually to the clerk of the house of 
representatives, the clerk of the senate, and the joint committee on environment on natural 
resources informing them on how the commonwealth and affiliated agencies are mitigating the 
impact of flooding.